src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON св_9b/c1
св_нп_9b/c1 ;
+V+Perf+TV+Inf:ере́ть # ;
+V+Perf+TV:ер Past_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:ер Perf_PastVrbAdv_C ;
+V+Perf+TV:ере́ Perf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
+V+Perf+TV:ер PastAct ;
+V+Perf+TV:р Perf_Fut_1_end ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёр PastPass_stem ;

LEXICON св_нп_9b/c1
+V+Perf+IV+Inf:ере́ть # ;
+V+Perf+IV:ер Past_shift ;
+V+Perf+IV:ер Perf_PastVrbAdv_C ;
+V+Perf+IV:ере́ Perf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
+V+Perf+IV:ер PastAct ;
+V+Perf+IV:р Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_нп_9b/c1_прич._прош._ме/рший
+V+Perf+IV+Inf:ере́ть # ;
+V+Perf+IV:ер Past_shift ;
+V+Perf+IV:ер Perf_PastVrbAdv_C ;
+V+Perf+IV:ере́ Perf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
+V+Perf+IV:е́р PastAct ;                ! CHECK THIS STRESS у́мерший или уме́рший
+V+Perf+IV:р Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_нп_9b/c1_прич._прош._V/ме/рший
св_нп_9b/c1_прич._прош._ме/рший ;
+V+Perf+IV:ер PastAct ;

!- - - - - - - Stem type 9 Lexicalized participial forms- - - - - - - 

LEXICON св_9b_ё_Lxc
св_нп_9b_ё_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV+Inf:ере́%<ть # ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёр Past_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёр Perf_PastVrbAdv_C ;
+V+Perf+TV:ере́ Perf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
+V+Perf+TV+Fut:р PresFut_1_end ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Imp+Pl1:рём # ;
+V+Perf+TV:р Imper_stressed ; 
+V+Perf+TV:ёр PastAct_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:ере́ PastAct_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:ёр PastPass_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_нп_9b_ё_Lxc
+V+Perf+IV+Inf:ере́%<ть # ;
+V+Perf+IV:ёр Past_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:ёр Perf_PastVrbAdv_C ;
+V+Perf+IV:ере́ Perf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
+V+Perf+IV+Fut:р PresFut_1_end ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1:рём # ;
+V+Perf+IV:р Imper_stressed ; 
+V+Perf+IV:ёр PastAct_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+IV:ере́ PastAct_Lxc ;

!====================================== Stem type 10 =====================================
!                                           оть
! Make sure that the lexical stems are stressed.

LEXICON нсв_10c
нсв_нп_10c ;
+V+Impf+TV:о́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_shift_w/Pass ;

LEXICON нсв_10c_R
+V+Impf+IV:о́ Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_shift_R ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_10c
+V+Impf+IV:о́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_shift ;

LEXICON нсв_10c_ро́ть
нсв_нп_ро́ть_10c ;
+V+Impf+TV:ро́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
! +V+Impf+TV+Prs:р PresFut_1_shift_роть ;
+V+Impf+TV:р Imper_stressed ;
+V+Impf+TV:р%<ю PresAct ;
! +V+Impf+TV+Prs:р PresFut_1_shift_роть_Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:р%<ю PresAct_Pass ;

LEXICON нсв_10c_ро́ть_R
+V+Impf+IV:ро́ Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
! +V+Impf+IV+Prs:р PresFut_1_shift_роть_R ;
+V+Impf+IV:р Imper_stressed_R ;
+V+Impf+IV:р%<ю PresAct_R ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_ро́ть_10c
+V+Impf+IV:ро́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
! +V+Impf+IV+Prs:р PresFut_1_shift_роть ;
+V+Impf+IV:р Imper_stressed ;
+V+Impf+IV:р%<ю PresAct ;

!LEXICON нсв_10c_МОЛОТЬ
!! Active Voice
!+V+Impf+Inf:оло́%<ть # ;
!+V+Impf:оло́ Past_stem ;
!+V+Impf+PstAct+Adv+Fac:оло́ Impf_PastVrbAdv_V ;
!+V+Impf+Prs:е́л PresFut_1_shift ;
!+V+Impf+Fut:оло́%<ть% бу́д PresFut_1_stem ;
!+V+Impf:ел Imper_stressed ;
!+V+Impf+PstAct:оло́ PastAct ;
!+V+Impf+PrsAct:е́л%<ю PresAct ;
!+V+Impf+PstPss:оло́ PastPass_stem ;
!! Passive Voice
!+V+Impf+Inf+Pass:оло́%<ться # ;
!+V+Impf:оло́ Past_stem_Pass ;
!+V+Impf+Prs+Pass:е́л PresFut_1_shift_R ;
!+V+Impf+Fut+Pass:оло́%<ться% бу́д PresFut_1_stem ;
!+V+Impf+PstAct+Pass:оло́ PastAct_R ;  ! Tags are problematic here...
!+V+Impf+PrsAct+Pass:е́л%<ю PresAct_R ; ! Tags are problematic here...

LEXICON св_10a
св_10a? ;
+V+Perf+TV:о PastPass_stem ;

LEXICON св_10a_R
+V+Perf+IV:о Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem_R ;

LEXICON св_нп_10a
+V+Perf+IV:о Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_10a?
св_нп_10a ;
+V+Perf+TV:о Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_10c
св_10c? ;
+V+Perf+TV:о́ PastPass_stem ;

LEXICON св_10c_R
+V+Perf+IV:о́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_shift_R ;

LEXICON св_10c_R_буд._мелю/сь,_ме/лется,_ме/лются
+V+Perf+IV:оло́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:е́л Perf_Fut_1_shift_R ;

LEXICON св_нп_10c
+V+Perf+IV:о́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Fut_1_shift ;

LEXICON св_10c?
св_нп_10c ;
+V+Perf+TV:о́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV: Perf_Fut_1_shift ;

LEXICON св_10c_ро́ть
+V+Perf+TV:ро́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:ро́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:ро́ PastPass_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV+Fut:р PresFut_1_shift_роть ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Imp+Pl1:рем # ;
+V+Perf+TV:р Imper_stressed ;
+V+Perf+IV+Fut:р PresFut_1_shift_роть ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1:рем # ;
+V+Perf+IV:р Imper_stressed ;

LEXICON св_10c_ро́ть_R
+V+Perf+IV:ро́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV+Fut:р PresFut_1_shift_роть_R ;
! +V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl1:ремся # ;
+V+Perf+IV:р Imper_stressed_R ;

!====================================== Stem type 11 =====================================
!                               бить, вить, лить, пить, шить
! No present verbal adverb

LEXICON св_11a
св_нп_11a ;
+V+Perf+TV:и Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Fей Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:и PastPass_stem ;

LEXICON св_нп_11a
+V+Perf+IV:и Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:%^Fей Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON нсв_11b
+V+Impf+TV:и́ Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:%^Fе́й Impf_Pres_1_end_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+IV:и́ Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV:%^Fе́й Impf_Pres_1_end ;

LEXICON нсв_11b_R
+V+Impf+IV:и́ Impf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Impf+IV:%^Fе́й Impf_Pres_1_end_R ;

LEXICON нсв_11b/c
+V+Impf+TV:и́ Impf_Inf_V_shift_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV:%^Fе́й Impf_Pres_1_end_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+IV:и́ Impf_Inf_V_shift ;
+V+Impf+IV:%^Fе́й Impf_Pres_1_end ;

LEXICON нсв_11b/c''_R
+V+Impf+IV:и́ Impf_Inf_shift''_R ;
+V+Impf+IV:%^Fе́й Impf_Pres_1_end_R ;

LEXICON нсв_11b/c''_R_безл.
+V+Impf+IV:и́ Impf_Inf_shift''_R_безл. ;
+V+Impf+IV:%^Fе́й Impf_Pres_1_end_R_безл. ;

LEXICON св_11b
св_11b? ;
+V+Perf+TV:и́ PastPass_stem ;

LEXICON св_11b_R
+V+Perf+IV:и́ Perf_Inf_stem_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:%^Fе́й Perf_Fut_1_end_R ;

LEXICON св_нп_11b
+V+Perf+IV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+IV:%^Fе́й Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_11b?
св_нп_11b ;
+V+Perf+TV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Fе́й Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_11b/c
св_11b/c? ;
+V+Perf+TV:и́ PastPass_stem ;

LEXICON св_11b/c_развить
св_11b/c? ;
! +V+Perf+TV+PstPss:и́т LF_stem ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Der+Der/PstPss+A:и́т LF_stem ;
! +V+Perf+TV+PstPss:ит LF_stem ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Der+Der/PstPss+A:ит LF_stem ;
! +V+Perf+TV+PstPss:и́т SF_c ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Der+Der/PstPss+A:и́т SF_c ;
! +V+Perf+TV+PstPss:ит SF_c ;
! +V+Perf+TV+Der+Der/PstPss+A:ит SF_c ;

LEXICON св_11b/c[1]
св_11b/c? ;
+V+Perf+TV:и́ PastPass_stem ;

LEXICON св_11b/c''_R
+V+Perf+IV:и́ Perf_Inf_shift''_R ;
+V+Perf+IV:%^Fе́й Perf_Fut_1_end_R ;

LEXICON св_нп_11b/c
+V+Perf+IV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_shift ;
+V+Perf+IV:%^Fе́й Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_нп_11b/c1
+V+Perf+IV: Perf_Inf_V_shift1_и́ть ;
+V+Perf+IV:%^Fе́й Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_11b/c?
св_нп_11b/c ;
+V+Perf+TV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_shift ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Fе́й Perf_Fut_1_end ;

!- - - - - - - Stem type 11 Lexicalized participial forms- - - - - - - 

LEXICON св_11a_Lxc
св_нп_11a_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:и Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Fей Perf_Fut_1_stem ;
+V+Perf+TV:и PastPass_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_11b/c_развить_Lxc
св_11b/c?_Lxc ;
! +V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Lxc:и́т LF_stem ;
! +V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Lxc:ит LF_stem ;
! +V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Lxc:и́т SF_c ;
! +V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Lxc:ит SF_c ;

LEXICON св_11b_Lxc
св_11b?_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:и́ PastPass_stem_Lxc ;

LEXICON св_нп_11a_Lxc
+V+Perf+IV:и Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+IV:%^Fей Perf_Fut_1_stem ;

LEXICON св_11b/c?_Lxc
св_нп_11b/c_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_shift_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Fе́й Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_нп_11b/c_Lxc
+V+Perf+IV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_shift_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+IV:%^Fе́й Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_11b?_Lxc
св_нп_11b_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+TV:%^Fе́й Perf_Fut_1_end ;

LEXICON св_нп_11b_Lxc
+V+Perf+IV:и́ Perf_Inf_V_stem_Lxc ;
+V+Perf+IV:%^Fе́й Perf_Fut_1_end ;

!====================================== Stem type 12 =====================================
!                                       ыть, уть, ить
! 12A has present passive ppl

LEXICON нсв_12a
нсв_нп_12a ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Inf_V_stem_w/Pass ;
+V+Impf+TV: Impf_Pres_1_stem_w/Pass ;

LEXICON нсв_нп_12a
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Inf_V_stem ;
+V+Impf+IV: Impf_Pres_1_stem ;
