src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verb
колоть:ко́л нсв_10c "weight: 2.274314912403788" ;
молоть:мо́л нсв_10c "weight: 1.429216872389531" ;
полоть:по́л нсв_10c "weight: 1.429216872389531" ;
колоться:ко́л нсв_10c_R ;
пороть:по́%^R нсв_10c "weight: 1.7813993905008936" ;
бороться:бо́%^R нсв_10c_R "weight: 3.2758632009666484" ;
пороться:по́%^R нсв_10c_R ;
бить:б нсв_11b "weight: 3.7799493241056608" ;
шить:ш нсв_11b "weight: 3.3599112600540666" ;
биться:б нсв_11b_R "weight: 3.350903347873133" ;
вить:в нсв_11b/c "weight: 2.960695789431786" ;
лить:л нсв_11b/c "weight: 3.1575706544107596" ;
пить:п нсв_11b/c "weight: 3.5667292255116605" ;
виться:в нсв_11b/c''_R "weight: 2.666005971798824" ;
литься:л нсв_11b/c''_R "weight: 3.167600995901687" ;
питься:п нсв_11b/c''_R_безл. "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
греть:гре́ нсв_12a "weight: 2.358635798103824" ;
брить:бри́ нсв_12a "weight: 2.967035967462805" ;
дуть:ду́ нсв_12a "weight: 2.9027038424540996" ;
почить:почи́ нсв_нп_12a "weight: 2.795639829615504" ;
вымолоть:в%^Yмол св_10a ;
выполоть:в%^Yпол св_10a "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
выпороть:в%^Yпо%^R св_10a "weight: 1.6053081314452122" ;
выпороть:в%^Yпо%^R св_10a "weight: 1.6053081314452122" ;
выпороться:в%^Yпо%^R св_10a_R ;
доколоть:доко́л св_10c ;
замолоть:замо́л св_10c ;
домолоть:домо́л св_10c ;
дополоть:допо́л св_10c ;
надколоться:надко́л св_10c_R ;
проколоться:проко́л св_10c_R "weight: 1.7302468680535124" ;
отколоться:отко́л св_10c_R "weight: 2.543160224696368" ;
перемолоться:перем св_10c_R_буд._мелю/сь,_ме/лется,_ме/лются ;
размолоться:разм св_10c_R_буд._мелю/сь,_ме/лется,_ме/лются ;
измолоться:изм св_10c_R_буд._мелю/сь,_ме/лется,_ме/лются ;
смолоться:см св_10c_R_буд._мелю/сь,_ме/лется,_ме/лются ;
пропороть:пропо́%^R св_10c "weight: 1.8271568810615688" ;
подпороться:подпо́%^R св_10c_R "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
повыбить:повы́б св_11a "weight: 1.5261268853975876" ;
вывить:вы́в св_11a ;
вылить:вы́л св_11a "weight: 2.526126885397588" ;
выпить:вы́п св_11a "weight: 3.838727324658847" ;
взбить:вз%^oб св_11b "weight: 3.2302774022373866" ;
отбить:от%^oб св_11b "weight: 3.4462502116883114" ;
перешить:переш св_11b "weight: 2.304278135781231" ;
отшить:от%^oш св_11b "weight: 2.0576058024398427" ;
перебиться:переб св_11b_R ;
прибиться:приб св_11b_R "weight: 1.7813993905008936" ;
сбиться:с%^oб св_11b_R "weight: 3.0524661627874314" ;
зашиться:заш св_11b_R ;
ушиться:уш св_11b_R ;
взвить:вз%^oв св_11b/c ;
увить:ув св_11b/c "weight: 3.0472649691016236" ;
спить:с%^oп св_11b/c "weight: 2.534727057159505" ;
развить:ра́з%^oв св_11b/c_развить "weight: 3.9735950163473435" ;
привиться:прив св_11b/c''_R "weight: 1.8271568810615688" ;
влиться:в%^oл св_11b/c''_R "weight: 2.12818687672555" ;
пропиться:проп св_11b/c''_R "weight: 1.1281868767255503" ;
полить:по́л св_11b/c[1] "weight: 2.9275274261791315" ;
подпить:по́д%^oп св_11b/c[1] "weight: 2.0312768637174936" ;
пропить:про́п св_11b/c[1] "weight: 2.6400702377044243" ;
запереть:за́п св_9b/c1 "weight: 4.146262940371345" ;
отпереть:о́т%^oп св_9b/c1 "weight: 2.242130229032387" ;
подвыпить:подвы́п св_нп_11a "weight: 3.3699823080207487" ;
запить:за́п св_нп_11b/c1 "weight: 1.8685495662197937" ;
отмереть:о́т%^oм св_нп_9b/c1_прич._прош._ме/рший "weight: 2.3712249254118443" ;
обмереть:о́б%^oм св_нп_9b/c1_прич._прош._V/ме/рший "weight: 1.3042781357812314" ;
перемереть:пе́рем св_нп_9b/c1_прич._прош._V/ме/рший ;
замереть:за́м св_нп_9b/c1_прич._прош._V/ме/рший "weight: 3.149376175795488" ;
примереть:при́м св_нп_9b/c1_прич._прош._ме/рший ;
умереть:у́м св_нп_9b/c1_прич._прош._ме/рший "weight: 3.7711457561353408" ;
помереть:по́м св_нп_9b/c1_прич._прош._V/ме/рший "weight: 1.6053081314452122" ;
LEXICON LexicalizedParticiple
вылить:вы́л св_11a_Lxc "weight: 2.526126885397588" ;
набить:наб св_11b_Lxc "weight: 4.071434001863412" ;
разбить:раз%^oб св_11b_Lxc "weight: 4.282154098371029" ;
убить:уб св_11b_Lxc "weight: 4.484404010945285" ;
развить:ра́з%^oв св_11b/c_развить_Lxc "weight: 3.9735950163473435" ;
потереть:пот св_9b_ё_Lxc "weight: 3.2127631546598807" ;
протереть:прот св_9b_ё_Lxc "weight: 2.5514327506623578" ;
